Maine, session 132, LD326.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §654-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 401, Pt. A, §8, is
further amended to read:
1. Exemption. The residential real estate up to the just value of $4,000 $10,000,
having a taxable situs in the place of residence, of inhabitants of the State who are legally
blind as determined by a properly licensed Doctor of Medicine, Doctor of Osteopathy or
Doctor of Optometry is exempt from taxation.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2026.